Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 2
DISPOSAL DISTRICTS (1953 ACT)

Cross references:

For the "Special District Act", see article 1 of title 32.

30-20-201. Legislative declaration.

It is declared that the creation of disposal districts, having purposes and powers provided in this part 2, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants of said districts.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 475, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-11-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-11-1.

30-20-202. Creation - proviso.

Whenever a county has established and maintains a county public health agency or, in conjunction with one or more adjacent counties, a district public health agency as provided by part 5 of article 1 of title 25, C.R.S., such county may establish one or more disposal districts. Such district shall be composed of the unincorporated area benefited by the establishment of the proposed disposal district for the collection and disposal of garbage, waste, and trash. The boundaries of such district are to be designated by the board of county commissioners of the county.

It is the duty of the county board of health or the district board of health, which the county maintains under the authority of part 5 of article 1 of title 25, C.R.S., upon request from the board of county commissioners of such county, to formulate a tentative plan for the formation of such disposal district, said plan to include: Recommendations as to the area to be benefited; a detailed estimate of annual costs for the operation and maintenance of the district affairs and the equipment and personnel thereof; boundaries and the approximate valuation for assessment therein; and proposed rules, regulations, and schedules for the district. Upon completion of said plan, the board of health shall certify such plan to the board of county commissioners.

Before the adoption of any resolution of the board of county commissioners creating a disposal district, a public hearing shall be held by the board to ascertain the sentiment of residents within the proposed area toward the establishment of such district. For the purposes of such hearing, the board of county commissioners shall give notice thereof, which notice shall set forth the time, date, place, and purpose of such hearing, shall set forth a description of the proposed boundaries, and shall be published once weekly for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published and of general circulation in the county. The date for such hearing shall not be sooner than five days nor later than thirty days following the date of the last publication of said notice.

After the hearing, the board of county commissioners may, at any regularly scheduled meeting, change, amend, reject, or adopt the certified plan, and by resolution create a disposal district.

Any provisions in this part 2 to the contrary notwithstanding, no tract or parcel of real estate used for manufacturing, mining, railroad, or industrial purposes, which, together with the buildings, improvements, machinery, and equipment thereon situate, shall have a valuation for assessment in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars at the date of the adoption by the board of county commissioners of a resolution creating a disposal district, shall be included in any district organized under this part 2 without the written consent of the owner thereof. No personal property shall be included within any district which is situate upon real estate not included in such district. If, contrary to the provisions of this subsection (5), any such tract, parcel, or personal property is included in any district, the owner thereof, on petition to the board of county commissioners which adopted the resolution creating the district, shall be entitled to have such property excluded from the district free and clear of any contract, obligations, lien, or charge to which it may or might have been liable as a part of the district.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 475, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 89-11-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-11-2.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2119, § 166, effective August 11.

30-20-203. Powers.

The board of county commissioners, following the creation of such district and acting on behalf thereof:

Shall in each year determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation after taking into consideration all sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of county commissioners, a rate of levy, not to exceed one-half mill, to be levied upon every dollar of valuation for assessment of the property within the district, which levy, together with other revenues of the district, will raise the amount required by the district annually to supply funds for paying the expenses, acquisition of equipment, costs of operation, maintenance, and employment of personnel therefor;

May establish and fill a position of county sanitation engineer to supervise and manage the manner of collection and disposing of trash, waste, and garbage of the district, and fix the compensation attached to such position to be paid from the funds of the district, or may authorize an administrative official of the county to assume the functions of such position in addition to his customary duties, and provide for the additional compensation that may be allowed for such official to be paid from the funds of the district;

May provide with the funds of the district for the employment of personnel to operate and manage the facilities for the collection and disposal of trash, waste, and garbage within the district;

May enter into and execute contracts on behalf of the district with any firm, corporation, or individual to provide for the collection or disposal, or both, of trash, wastes, and garbage within the district, the revenues from which, if any, shall be solely for the uses and benefits of the district;

May enter into and execute contracts on behalf of the district with any incorporated village, town, city, or other district for the joint operation of any dump, sanitary fill, or other satisfactory means of garbage and trash disposal, the revenue from which, if any, shall be solely for the uses and benefits of the district;

May by lease, contract, or otherwise provide areas or dumps within or without the boundaries of the district for the disposal of waste, trash, and garbage collected by the district, the costs for which shall be borne by the district;

May acquire by purchase or lease or otherwise provide for equipment for the collection and disposal of garbage, waste, and trash, the costs of which shall be borne by the district;

May promulgate and adopt on behalf of the district such schedules, rules, or regulations as may be necessary for the orderly collection of trash, wastes, or garbage from the district, and for the maintenance and operation of dumps, sanitary fills, or other satisfactory disposal methods and collection areas, which, when so adopted, may be administered and enforced by the county or district public health agency, as the case may be, as provided in other cases by sections 25-1-506 and 25-1-514, C.R.S.;

May enlarge the area of the district by inclusion of other unincorporated areas, after giving notice of and holding a public hearing thereof, as provided for the creation of the district under section 30-20-202. The area to be included may or may not be adjacent to the district.

May exclude any area from the district or dissolve any district created under this part 2, after giving notice of and holding a public hearing thereon, as provided for the creation of the district under section 30-20-202.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 476, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 89-11-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-11-3.

L. 2008:

(1)(h) amended, p. 2054, § 12, effective July 1.

30-20-204. Budget.

The operations of the disposal district shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of the local government budget law of Colorado.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 478, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 89-11-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-11-4.

Cross references:

For the local government budget law, see § 29-1-101 et seq.

30-20-205. Character of this part 2.

Nothing in this part 2 shall repeal or affect any other law. It is intended that this part 2 shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objects, and not an exclusive one.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 478, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 89-11-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-11-5.